District of Columbia statutes.
16-1124

Ejectment for non-payment of rent; time limitation on relief from judgment; set-off; dismissal upon payment.

(a)

In a case between landlord and tenant, where one-half year’s rent or more is in arrear and unpaid, and the landlord or lessor to whom the rent is due has the right by law, in default of a sufficiency of goods and chattels whereon to distrain for the satisfaction of the rent due, to re-enter for non-payment of the rent, he may, without any formal demand or re-entry, commence a civil action in ejectment for the recovery of the demised premises.

(b)

When a judgment is given for the plaintiff in an action pursuant to this section, and execution is had on the judgment, before the rent in arrear and costs of suit are paid, the lease of the property shall cease and be determined, unless the judgment is reversed on appeal or certiorari or, within six months after execution on the judgment, the defendant or a person who has succeeded to his interest, or a mortgagee of the lease or of any party thereof who was not in possession when final judgment was rendered, applies to the court for an order granting equitable relief from the judgment, which is subsequently granted.

(c)

When possession of the property recovered has been delivered to the plaintiff under execution issued upon a judgment in an action pursuant to this section, and, in connection with the application for equitable relief from the judgment, the defendant or other person referred to in subsection (b) of this section, has, prior to or at the time of his application, paid or tendered to the plaintiff or his legal representative or successor in interest, or paid into court for the use of the person entitled thereto, the amount of rent in arrear, as stated in the judgment and costs of suit and all damages sustained by the plaintiff, the order for restoration of possession of the property to the person who made the payment shall provide for setting off the sum that the plaintiff has made, or that he might, without fraud, deceit, or willful neglect, have made, of the property, during his possession, against the rent accruing after the judgment was rendered, and for reimbursement to the applicant of the balance, if any, of the sum paid into court by him, after making the set-off prescribed by this subsection.

(d)

At any time before the trial of an action pursuant to this section, the defendant may pay or tender to the plaintiff, or pay into court, the amount of all the rent then in arrear, and costs of suit. Thereupon, the action shall be dismissed.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 568, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 16-1124.
1973 Ed., § 16-1124.

Prior Codifications